test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Nouns_NeutAnim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - чудовище M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Nom: чудовище
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Acc: чудовище
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Gen: чудовища
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Loc: чудовище
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Dat: чудовищу
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Ins: чудовищем
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Nom: чудовища
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Acc: чудовищ
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Gen: чудовищ
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Loc: чудовищах
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Dat: чудовищам
      чудовище+N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Ins: чудовищами
